Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1507
Importer, defined.

Importer shall mean any person who imports or causes to be imported petroleum from any other state or territory of the United States or from a foreign country for such person's own use in or for sale in this state, whether or not in the original package, receptacle, or container. Importer shall not include a person who imports petroleum in a tank directly connected to the engine of a motor vehicle, train, watercraft, or airplane for purposes of providing fuel to the engine to which the tank is connected.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 7.